Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-807
Affiliation with federation.

The local governing authority of each existing public library within a county participating in a public library federation shall either choose to affiliate with the federation or shall choose to exempt itself from the federation. A county, city, village, or township public library that chooses to affiliate with the federation shall agree to provide basic public library services free of charge to all residents within the federation area. Residents within the area of a public library that has chosen to exempt itself from the federation shall not be entitled to participate in programs of the public library federation. The public library board of a county, city, village, or township shall retain its authority and autonomy regardless of whether or not the public library is an affiliate of the federation.

Laws 1999, LB 362, § 7.